Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-535
Hunting game from aircraft or watercraft; prohibited acts; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to hunt any game from any boat or watercraft while being propelled by sails or electric, gas, or steam power or from any aircraft or hydroplane. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 255.